Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COOK; PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriations. new text end new text begin (a) $3,700,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for one or more grants to the city of Cook for improvements and betterments of a capital nature as described in this section. new text end new text begin (b) $1,500,000 of this appropriation is to predesign, design, engineer, and construct improvements to the city's inflow and infiltration collection system and to rehabilitate the city's wastewater treatment pond system. new text end new text begin (c) $2,200,000 of this appropriation is to predesign, design, engineer, and construct water and sewer line infrastructure associated with the city's North Business Park looping project. new text end new text begin (d) Any unspent portion of this appropriation remaining after completion of a project described in this subdivision, after written notice to the commissioner of management and budget, is available for the purposes of this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $3,700,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end